Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1505
Proposed wellhead protection area; public notice and comment.

The controlling entity shall publicize proposed boundaries for the wellhead protection area and the proposed controls and shall provide time for public comment at one or more regularly scheduled public meetings of the governing board of the controlling entity. Notice of the time for public comment shall be published in conjunction with notice of such regularly scheduled meeting. A description of the proposed boundaries and the text of the proposed controls shall be available at the office of the controlling entity for thirty days before such meeting. Persons shall be given the opportunity to speak on the proposed designation and the proposed controls or to submit written testimony for consideration by the controlling entity.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 6.